Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.280

Chapter cumulative.

The remedies provided by this chapter are cumulative, and shall not be construed as restricting any remedy, provisional or otherwise, provided by law for the benefit of any party, and no judgment under this chapter shall preclude any party from obtaining additional relief based upon the same facts.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 99 s 8.]